Wyoming, session 2025, HB0122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 18-15-102(d) is amended to read:
18-15-102. Formation of district; mill levy.
(d) If the proposition to authorize a mill levy is
approved by the qualified electors of the proposed district
under subsection (c) of this section, the proposition to
impose a levy in the same or at a different amount not to
exceed two (2) mills, shall be submitted to the resident
electors within the proposed district at the first general
election held two (2) four (4) years after the election
authorizing the district and every four (4) years
thereafter, until defeated. If the proposition to impose or
continue a mill levy is defeated, the proposition shall not
be submitted to the electors for a period of not less than
one (1) year.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0122
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2